Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3207
Districts; change of boundaries, division, or merger.

With the approval of the affected natural resources districts, the commission may change the boundaries of natural resources districts, merge two or more such districts into a single district, divide one district into two or more new districts, or divide and merge one district into two or more other existing districts. The commission may also provide for the merger with such districts of other special-purpose districts as enumerated in section 2-3201. In exercising such powers, the commission shall be bound by the criteria and procedures provided by sections 2-3201 to 2-3212.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 7, p. 105;

Laws 1972, LB 543, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1045, § 2.